Washington statutes.
RCW 7.25.040

Other declaratory judgment provisions applicable.

Except as otherwise herein provided, all the provisions of the laws of Washington relating to declaratory judgments shall apply to the action herein provided for. The remedy and procedure herein provided shall be in addition to other remedies and procedures now provided by law.

[ 1999 c 284 s 5; 1939 c 153 s 4; RRS s 5616-14. Formerly RCW 7.24.180.]

NOTES:

Uniform Declaratory Judgments Act: Chapter 7.24 RCW.